Maryland, session 2025, HB0490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
12–301.
(a) This section applies only to commission counties.
(b) The provisions of §§ 9–105 and 9–106 of this article apply to an act, an
ordinance, or a resolution adopted under this section.
(c) The county commissioners shall:
(1) establish a competitive bidding process for awarding contracts for
services or the purchase of supplies if the contract exceeds $15,000;
(2) require a bond in connection with a contract, regardless of the amount;
and
(3) if no bids are submitted in response to a request for bids, obtain the
services or supplies in a manner that the county commissioners consider appropriate.
(d) In Somerset County, subsection (c) of this section does not apply to a contract
solely for design or consultation services.
– 1 –

Ch. 781 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) IN ST. MARY’S COUNTY, SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES
ONLY TO A CONTRACT FOR SERVICES OR THE PURCHASE OF SUPPLIES IF THE
CONTRACT EXCEEDS $50,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –